District of Columbia statutes.
3-1319

Audit.

The Auditor of the District of Columbia shall cause to be conducted a regular post audit of all accounts and transactions of the Board with respect to the operation of lottery and daily numbers games.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2519.

Prior Codifications